Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1293
Salvage branded certificate of title; when issued; procedure.

When an insurance company acquires a salvage motorboat through payment of a total loss settlement on account of damage, the company shall obtain the certificate of title from the owner, surrender such certificate of title to the county treasurer, and make application for a salvage branded certificate of title which shall be assigned when the company transfers ownership. An insurer shall take title to a salvage motorboat for which a total loss settlement is made unless the owner of the motorboat elects to retain the motorboat. If the owner elects to retain the motorboat, the insurance company shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of such fact in a format prescribed by the department. Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection (3) of section 60-1508, the insurance company shall report electronically to the department using the electronic reporting system. The department shall immediately enter the salvage brand onto the computerized record of the motorboat. The insurance company shall also notify the owner of the owner's responsibility to comply with this section. The owner shall, within thirty days after the settlement of the loss, forward the properly endorsed acceptable certificate of title to the county treasurer. Upon receipt of the certificate of title, the county treasurer shall issue a salvage branded certificate of title for the motorboat unless the motorboat has been rebuilt or reconstructed, in which case the county treasurer shall issue a previously salvaged branded certificate of title for the motorboat.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 26;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 5.